Connecticut, session 2026, SB00479.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General
Assembly convened:
1 Section 1. (NEW) (Effective from passage) (a) As used in this section, (1)
2 "Rural Health Transformation Program" means a federal program
3 established pursuant to P.L. 119-21 that provides grants to states to
4 improve the health of rural residents; and (2) "technical assistance
5 funding" means federal grants to states to implement system
6 modifications to implement eligibility changes for certain public
7 assistance programs, including, but not limited to, Medicaid required
8 pursuant to P.L. 119-21.
9 (b) Not later than thirty days before submitting an application for
10 Rural Health Transformation Program grants or for technical assistance
11 funding, the Commissioner of Social Services shall forward such
12 application to the joint standing committee of the General Assembly
13 having cognizance of matters relating to human services. The committee
14 may schedule a public hearing on such application and vote on whether
sSB479 / File No. 480 1

sSB479 File No. 480
15 to approve, deny or modify the application.
16 (c) If the committee does not vote to approve, deny or modify such
17 application not later than thirty days after receipt of such application
18 from the commissioner, the application shall be deemed approved. If
19 the committee votes to deny the application, the commissioner shall not
20 submit such application to the federal government. If the committee
21 votes to modify the application, the commissioner shall modify the
22 application in accordance with the committee's vote before submission
23 to the federal government.
This act shall take effect as follows and shall amend the following
sections:
Section 1 from passage New section
Statement of Legislative Commissioners:
In Subsec. (a)(1), "grant program" was changed to "program" and "to be
distributed" was changed to "that provides grants" for clarity.
HS Joint Favorable Subst. -LCO
sSB479 / File No. 480 2

sSB479 File No. 480
The following Fiscal Impact Statement and Bill Analysis are prepared for the benefit of the members of
the General Assembly, solely for purposes of information, summarization and explanation and do not
represent the intent of the General Assembly or either chamber thereof for any purpose. In general,
fiscal impacts are based upon a variety of informational sources, including the analyst’s professional
knowledge. Whenever applicable, agency data is consulted as part of the analysis, however final
products do not necessarily reflect an assessment from any specific department.
OFA Fiscal Note
State Impact:
Agency Affected Fund-Effect FY 27 $ FY 28 $
Social Services, Dept. Federal Funds - See Below See Below
See Below
Note: GF=General Fund
Municipal Impact: None
Explanation
The bill requires the Department of Social Services (DSS) to submit
any application for Rural Health Transformation Program grants or
technical assistance funding to the Human Services Committee at least
30 days before submitting it for federal approval. DSS cannot submit the
application if the committee votes to deny it, or must submit a revised
application if the committee votes to modify it.
To the extent this delays or modifies funding that DSS would have
otherwise received, the state could experience a fiscal impact that cannot
be determined at this time.
The Out Years
The annualized ongoing fiscal impact identified above would
continue into the future subject to certain federal grant opportunities
and related committee actions.
sSB479 / File No. 480 3

sSB479 File No. 480
OLR Bill Analysis
sSB 479
AN ACT CONCERNING OVERSIGHT OF FEDERAL FUND
APPLICATIONS BY THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL SERVICES.